Arkansas, session 2025, SB34.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Human Services - Division of Developmental Disabilities
Services for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of
regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) N249N DHS DIVISION DIRECTOR 1 GRADE SE02
(2) L008N PHYSICIAN SPECIALIST 6 GRADE MP07
(3) L011N DENTIST 1 GRADE MP06
*LCW018*
03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34
(4) L017N DHS ALEXANDER CHIEF PSYCHOLOGIST 1 GRADE MP05
(5) L018N NURSE PRACTITIONER 7 GRADE MP04
(6) L001C PSYCHOLOGIST SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE MP04
(7) L009C NURSE MANAGER 4 GRADE MP03
(8) L003C PSYCHOLOGIST 1 GRADE MP03
(9) L015C CLINICAL SPEECH PATHOLOGIST 10 GRADE MP02
(10) L036C NURSE INSTRUCTOR 4 GRADE MP02
(11) L019C REGISTERED NURSE COORDINATOR 6 GRADE MP02
(12) L027C REGISTERED NURSE SUPERVISOR 15 GRADE MP02
(13) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 74 GRADE MP01
(14) D065C NETWORK SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(15) D079C COMPUTER SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 5 GRADE IT02
(16) N175N DHS DDS ASST DIR FOR RESIDENTIAL SVC 1 GRADE GS15
(17) G286C DMS DEPUTY DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS15
(18) N144N DHS DDS DIR CLIENT SERVICES 1 GRADE GS14
(19) N081N DHS DDS SUPT HDC/CONWAY 1 GRADE GS14
(20) N101N DHS/DCO ASST DEP DIR PGM & ADMN SPT 1 GRADE GS14
(21) N110N DHS ASST DIR CONTRACT MONITORING UNIT 1 GRADE GS13
(22) N126N DHS DDS SUPT HDC 4 GRADE GS13
(23) N167N DHS POLICY & RESEARCH DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS12
(24) M005C DHS ASSISTANT SUPERINTENDENT - CONWAY 1 GRADE GS11
(25) G099C DHS PROGRAM ADMINISTRATOR 24 GRADE GS09
(26) L040C DIETARY SERVICES DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS09
(27) G109C GRANTS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(28) M009C LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER 1 GRADE GS09
(29) L021C NURSING HOME ASSISTANT ADMINISTRATOR 4 GRADE GS09
(30) L033C PSYCHOLOGICAL EXAMINER 10 GRADE GS09
(31) X038C QUALITY ASSURANCE MANAGER 2 GRADE GS09
(32) E024C TEACHER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS09
(33) A116C BUSINESS OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(34) E035C CERTIFIED MASTERS TEACHER 2 GRADE GS08
(35) G152C DHS PROGRAM MANAGER 20 GRADE GS08
(36) E026C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS08
(37) R014C PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(38) X062C QUALITY ASSURANCE COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS08
(39) E023C TRAINING PROJECT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34
(40) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 5 GRADE GS07
(41) S008C CAMPUS MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS07
(42) M043C DDS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS07
(43) A055C DHS INSTITUTION BUSINESS MANAGER 4 GRADE GS07
(44) G183C DHS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 49 GRADE GS07
(45) G182C DHS/DDS PROGRAM COORDINATOR 33 GRADE GS07
(46) L055C DIETICIAN 1 GRADE GS07
(47) S019C DIRECTOR MAINTENANCE 1 GRADE GS07
(48) E048C EDUCATION & INSTRUCTION SPECIALIST 10 GRADE GS07
(49) E032C EDUCATION COUNSELOR 1 GRADE GS07
(50) M026C LICENSED SOCIAL WORKER 3 GRADE GS07
(51) S017C MAINTENANCE COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS07
(52) L061C MEDICAL TECHNOLOGIST 2 GRADE GS07
(53) X095C QUALITY ASSURANCE ANALYST 7 GRADE GS07
(54) M024C RESIDENTIAL SERVICES MANAGER 14 GRADE GS07
(55) E040C STAFF DEVELOPMENT COORDINATOR 4 GRADE GS07
(56) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 6 GRADE GS06
(57) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(58) E044C CERTIFIED BACHELORS TEACHER 7 GRADE GS06
(59) M057C CHAPLAIN 1 GRADE GS06
(60) G210C DHS PROGRAM SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS06
(61) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS06
(62) R025C HUMAN RESOURCES ANALYST 7 GRADE GS06
(63) L069C LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE 104 GRADE GS06
(64) S033C MAINTENANCE SUPERVISOR 6 GRADE GS06
(65) A084C PROGRAM/FIELD AUDIT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(66) X136C QUALITY ASSURANCE REVIEWER 1 GRADE GS06
(67) L060C REHAB INSTRUCTOR SUPERVISOR 26 GRADE GS06
(68) M098C RESIDENTIAL CARE SHIFT MANAGER 55 GRADE GS06
(69) X094C SERVICES & PROGRAM LICENSING SPECIAL 1 GRADE GS06
(70) M054C SOCIAL SERVICE WORKER 11 GRADE GS06
(71) S021C WATER FILTER/WASTE DISPOSAL PLNT SUPV 1 GRADE GS06
(72) C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 9 GRADE GS05
(73) A088C ASSETS COORDINATOR 3 GRADE GS05
(74) S041C BOILER OPERATOR 2 GRADE GS05
(75) S025C BUILDING AND GROUNDS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS05
03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34
(76) V014C BUYER 2 GRADE GS05
(77) B090C ENGINEER TECHNICIAN 7 GRADE GS05
(78) A091C FISCAL SUPPORT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS05
(79) L070C HEALTH CARE ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(80) C030C HEALTH RECORDS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(81) D077C HELP DESK SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS05
(82) R032C HUMAN RESOURCES PROGRAM REPRESENTATIVE 3 GRADE GS05
(83) C054C LOCAL OFFICE ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST 8 GRADE GS05
(84) V015C PURCHASING SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS05
(85) M065C RECREATIONAL ACTIVITY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS05
(86) L066C REHABILITATION INSTRUCTOR 124 GRADE GS05
(87) M004C RESIDENTIAL OPERATIONS MANAGER 301 GRADE GS05
(88) S031C SKILLED TRADESMAN 25 GRADE GS05
(89) E051C STAFF DEVELOPMENT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS05
(90) S030C WATER FILTER/WASTE DISPOSAL PLNT OPER 2 GRADE GS05
(91) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 50 GRADE GS04
(92) S053C AUTO/DIESEL MECHANIC 1 GRADE GS04
(93) S061C CHDC LAUNDRY OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(94) L081C DENTAL ASSISTANT 2 GRADE GS04
(95) A098C FISCAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS04
(96) A102C FISCAL SUPPORT TECHNICIAN 3 GRADE GS04
(97) S044C FOOD PREPARATION MANAGER 4 GRADE GS04
(98) R038C HUMAN RESOURCES ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS04
(99) R036C HUMAN RESOURCES SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS04
(100) V020C INVENTORY CONTROL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS04
(101) S047C LANDSCAPE SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS04
(102) S046C MAINTENANCE TECHNICIAN 5 GRADE GS04
(103) C044C MEDICAL BILLING SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS04
(104) M063C RESIDENTIAL CARE PROGRAM COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS04
(105) V023C STOREROOM SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS04
(106) L074C THERAPY ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS04
(107) V025C WAREHOUSE SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS04
(108) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 67 GRADE GS03
(109) S081C APPRENTICE TRADESMAN 8 GRADE GS03
(110) M084C BEHAV HLTH AIDE 106 GRADE GS03
(111) L082C CERTIFIED NURSING ASSISTANT 782 GRADE GS03
03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34
(112) M090C DHS PROGRAM ASSISTANT 4 GRADE GS03
(113) S056C FOOD PREPARATION SUPERVISOR 6 GRADE GS03
(114) S067C HOUSEKEEPER SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS03
(115) S076C INSTITUTIONAL BEAUTICIAN 3 GRADE GS03
(116) V027C INVENTORY CONTROL TECHNICIAN 3 GRADE GS03
(117) S050C MAINTENANCE SPECIALIST 7 GRADE GS03
(118) C066C PATIENT ACCOUNT SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS03
(119) T087C SECURITY OFFICER 1 GRADE GS03
(120) C087C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST I 27 GRADE GS02
(121) S083C BAKER 4 GRADE GS02
(122) S082C CANTEEN SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS02
(123) S070C EQUIPMENT TECHNICIAN 18 GRADE GS02
(124) S085C FOOD PREPARATION SPECIALIST 13 GRADE GS02
(125) S084C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES SUPERVISOR 36 GRADE GS02
(126) S088C KITCHEN ASSISTANT 72 GRADE GS02
(127) L075C ORTHOTIST AIDE 4 GRADE GS02
(128) L085C PHYSICAL THERAPY AIDE 1 GRADE GS02
(129) E056C TEACHER ASSISTANT 1 GRADE GS02
(130) L084C THERAPY AIDE 1 GRADE GS02
(131) V028C WAREHOUSE WORKER 3 GRADE GS02
(132) S086C COOK 6 GRADE GS01
(133) S080C EQUIPMENT OPERATOR 1 GRADE GS01
(134) S089C FOOD PREPARATION TECHNICIAN 29 GRADE GS01
(135) S087C INSTITUTIONAL SERVICES ASSISTANT 87 GRADE GS01
(136) S065C MAINTENANCE ASSISTANT 6 GRADE GS01
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 2,490

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Department of Human Services - Division of Developmental Disabilities
Services for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-
time or temporary employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds
appropriated herein for such purposes: one hundred ninety-nine (199)
temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to exceed
those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or its
successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34
SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for personal services
and operating expenses of the Department of Human Services - Division of
Developmental Disabilities Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $104,057,583
(02) EXTRA HELP 2,860,944
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 45,126,030
(04) OVERTIME 4,310,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 30,477,449
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 25,000
(C) PROF. FEES 3,238,079
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,000,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) GRANTS/PATIENT SERVICES 2,487,134
(07) DATA PROCESSING SERVICES 1,000,000
(08) VOCATIONAL TRAINEES 239,000
(09) CHILDREN AND ADOLESCENT SERVICES 67,191
(10) PURCHASE OF SERVICES 6,805,302
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $201,693,712

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - SPECIAL OLYMPICS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account, for grants to the Arkansas
Special Olympics by the Department of Human Services - Division of
Developmental Disabilities Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS-SPECIAL OLYMPICS $178,768
03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - COMMUNITY PROGRAMS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Developmental Disabilities Services-Dog Track Special Revenue Fund, for
expenses of the private non-profit community based programs licensed by the
Department of Human Services - Division of Developmental Disabilities
Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) COMMUNITY PROGRAMS $50,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS-IN-AID. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account, for grants-in-aid to the
community providers of services to the developmentally disabled by the
Department of Human Services - Division of Developmental Disabilities
Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) GRANTS TO COMMUNITY PROVIDERS $15,892,045

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - INTER-DIVISIONAL PROGRAMS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Developmental Disabilities Services Fund Account, for integrated services and
programs developed by the various divisions, for services and programs
developed in conjunction with other state agencies, and for the development
and implementation of an integrated case management system for the Department
of Human Services - Division of Developmental Disabilities Services for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) INTER-DIVISIONAL PROGRAMS $108,644

03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34
SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS - STATE. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
Department of Human Services Grants Fund Account, for grant payments of the
Department of Human Services - Division of Developmental Disabilities
Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CHILDREN'S MEDICAL SERVICES-STATE $1,729,279

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION - GRANTS - FEDERAL. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Human Services, to be payable from the
federal funds as designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for
federally funded grants of the Department of Human Services - Division of
Developmental Disabilities Services for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CHILDREN'S MEDICAL SERVICES-FEDERAL $446,205

SECTION 10. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES - GRANTS TO COMMUNITY BASED PROVIDERS. Funds
allocated for community-based services under the appropriation for (i) the
Grants-in-Aid appropriation in this act, (ii) the Grants/Patient Services
Line in the Operations appropriation in this act, and (iii) the Inter-
Divisional Programs appropriation in this act, shall be used only to provide
services through private community based services licensed or certified by
the Arkansas Division of Developmental Disabilities Services (DDS) or
licensed or certified by a Provider-Led Arkansas Shared Savings Entity
(PASSE). Non-profit community-based programs licensed by the Division of
Developmental Disabilities Services are quasi-governmental instrumentalities
of the state which provide supports and services to individuals who have a
developmental disability or delay, who would otherwise require supports and
services through state-operated programs and facilities owned by the State of
03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34
Arkansas. When licensed providers are involved in delivering services which
are Medicaid reimbursable, they must enroll as a provider with the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and must bill the Arkansas Medicaid Program for all covered
services for eligible individuals.
Services which are covered by the Arkansas State Medicaid Program,
including the Provider-Led Arkansas Shared Savings Entity (PASSE) model, will
be utilized to the maximum extent possible for any individual who is eligible
for Medicaid coverage. It is the intent of this section that DDS, as a
general policy, maximize the use of Medicaid funding available for
appropriate services.
Licensed private community providers funded from these appropriations for
community based services shall:
1. Screen each individual to whom services are provided for a determination
of eligibility or ineligibility for Medicaid coverage within thirty days of
the first date that services are provided.
2. Meet minimum standards of performance in the delivery of services to
people with disabilities as defined by the Department of Human Services -
Division of Developmental Disabilities Services.
3. Supply statistical and financial data to the Department of Human Services
- Division of Developmental Disabilities Services.
4. Establish and maintain a sound financial management system in accordance
with guidelines as set forth by the Department of Human Services.
5. Establish and maintain community support programs designed to provide
coordinated care and treatment to ensure ongoing involvement and
individualized services for persons with disabilities.
It is the intent of this section to insure that wherever possible and
appropriate, Medicaid funds are utilized.
Nothing in this Act shall prevent the Division or any provider from
extending emergency services when appropriate measures have been taken in a
timely manner to secure Medicaid eligibility.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 11. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
ELIMINATION OF AUTISM WAIVER SERVICES WAITING LIST. Immediately upon the
03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34
effective date of this Act, the Department of Human Services - Division of
Developmental Disabilities Services shall budget, allocate, and expend up to
one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the elimination of the Autism Waiver
Services Program waiting list.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1,
2024 2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 12. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 13. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 14. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018

As Engrossed: S3/17/25 SB34
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee

































03-17-2025 16:24:39 LCW018